Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1734.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 8117(b)(3) of Title 74 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 8117. Electronic toll collection.* * *(b) Imposition of liability.--Liability under this section shall be imposed upon an owner for failure to pay the prescribed toll charges assessed under this section or the regulations of the commission occurring within the territorial limits of this Commonwealth. Based on evidence obtained by a toll collection system, the following shall apply:* * *(3) An owner that is a lessor of a vehicle as to which an invoice was issued under paragraph (1) shall not be liable 123456789101112131415161718 for tolls assessed in the invoice if the owner sends to the commission a copy of the rental, lease or other contract document covering the vehicle on the date of travel, with the name and address of the lessee clearly legible to the commission, within [30] 60 days after receiving the original invoice. Failure to send the information within the time limit under this paragraph shall render the lessor liable for the tolls and fees assessed in the invoice as prescribed by this section. If the lessor complies with the provisions of this section, the lessee of the vehicle on the date of travel shall be deemed to be the owner of the vehicle for purposes of this section and shall be subject to liability for the tolls and fees assessed in the invoice under this section.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1734PN2136 - 2 - 123456789101112131415